District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0167.
BE IT ENACTED BYTHE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Personal Medical Record Fee Exemption Amendment Act of2025”.

Sec. 2. Section 101aofthe District ofColumbia Health Occupations Revision Act of


1985, March 25, 1986 (D.C. Law 24-290; D.C. Official Code § 3-1210.12) is amended as
follows:

(2) Subsection (b) is amended to read as follows:

“(b) Except as provided in subsection (c-1) ofthis section, a health care entity may

require anauthorized person to pay.”

(b)Anew subsection (¢-1) is added to read as follows:

“(c-1)(1)A health care entity may notcharge the fees enumerated in subsection (b) ofthis

section for providing copiesofpersonal medical records requested by:

~ (A) The patient orclient;

“(B) The patient orclient’s personal representative:


“(C) An employee or other representative of a nonprofit legal services
entity representing the patient or client; or
(D) An attorney representing the patient or client; and
“(2) That will be used to support a claim or appeal under any provision of the
Social Security Act or for any other federal or District needs-based benefit or program.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code §1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.